District of Columbia statutes.
31-1605

Diagnosis of AIDS.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as preventing or restricting insurers or their agents or employees from following standard procedures for determining the insurability of or establishing the rates or premiums for new applicants diagnosed by a licensed physician as having AIDS, provided that the procedures:

(1)

Apply in the same manner to all other new applicants within the same category of insurance;

(2)

Are justified on the basis of actuarial evidence; and

(3)

Comply with other laws and rules of the District.

(b)

Repealed.

Aug. 7, 1986, D.C. Law 6-132, § 6, 33 DCR 3615
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-208, § 2(d), 36 DCR 471
1981 Ed., § 35-225.